test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-eraetuemae71_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - erätümä: # Verb (71) erätümä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     erätümä+V+Inf/mA: erätümä
     erätümä+V+Inf: erätüdäq
     erätümä+V+Act+PrfPrc: erätünüq
     erätümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: erätüt

     erätümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: erädü
     erätümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [erätüt, erätüdeq]
     erätümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: erätüs
     erätümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: erätümiq
     erätümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [erätütiq, erätüdeq]
     erätümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: erätüseq
     erätümä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: erädü
     erätümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: erädü
     erätümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [erätüt, erädüq, erätüdeq]
     erätümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: erädü
     erätümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: erätümiq
     erätümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [erätütiq, erätüdeq]
     erätümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [erädüq, erätüväq]

     erätümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: erätüdä
     erätümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: erätüdäs

     erätümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: erätüv

     erätümä+V+Jus: erätüguq
